bg-BG: Поддържана скорост на лентата: 1,875 инча/сек; 15 инча/сек; 3,75 инча/сек; 30 инча/сек; 7,5 инча/сек; Други
nl: Ondersteunde bandsnelheid: 1,875 ips; 15 ips; 3,75 ips; 30 ips; 7,5 ips; Andere
ko: 지원 테이프 속도: 1.875 ips; 15 ips; 3.75 ips; 30 ips; 7.5 ips; 기타
cs: Podporovaná rychlost pásky: 1,875 ips; 15 ips; 3,75 ips; 30 ips; 7,5 ips; Jiné
pl: Obsługiwana prędkość taśmy: 1,875 cala/s; 15 cali/s; 3,75 cala/s; 30 cali/s; 7,5 cala/s; Inne
pt-PT: Velocidade de fita suportada: 1,875 ips; 15 ips; 3,75 ips; 30 ips; 7,5 ips; Outro
tr: Desteklenen bant hızı: 1,875 ips; 15 ips; 3,75 ips; 30 ips; 7,5 ips; Diğer
hu: Támogatott szalagsebesség: 1,875 hüvelyk/mp; 15 hüvelyk/mp; 3,75 hüvelyk/mp; 30 hüvelyk/mp; 7,5 hüvelyk/mp; Egyéb
zh-CN: 支持的磁带速度: 1.875 英寸/秒; 15 英寸/秒; 3.75 英寸/秒; 30 英寸/秒; 7.5 英寸/秒; 其他
pt-BR: Velocidade de fita suportada: 1,875 ips; 15 ips; 3,75 ips; 30 ips; 7,5 ips; Outro
lt-LT: Palaikomas juostos greitis: 1,875 col./sek.; 15 col./sek.; 3,75 col./sek.; 30 col./sek.; 7,5 col./sek.; Kita
fi: Tuetut nauhanopeudet: 1,875 ips; 15 ips; 3,75 ips; 30 ips; 7,5 ips; Muu
zh-TW: 支援的磁帶速度: 1.875 ips; 15 ips; 3.75 ips; 30 ips; 7.5 ips; 其他
sk-SK: Podporovaná rýchlosť pásky: 1,875 ips; 15 ips; 3,75 ips; 30 ips; 7,5 ips; Iné
sv: Bandhastighet som stöds: 1,875 tum/s; 15 tum/s; 3,75 tum/s; 30 tum/s; 7,5 tum/s; Övrigt
th: ความเร็วเทปที่รองรับ: 1.875 ips; 15 ips; 3.75 ips; 30 ips; 7.5 ips; อื่นๆ
el: Υποστηριζόμενη ταχύτητα ταινίας: 1,875 ips; 15 ips; 3,75 ips; 30 ips; 7,5 ips; Άλλο
ja: サポートされるテープ速度: 1.875 ips; 15 ips; 3.75 ips; 30 ips; 7.5 ips; その他
nb: Bånd hastighet støttet: 1,875 tps; 15 tps; 3,75 tps; 30 tps; 7,5 tps; Annet
da: Understøttet båndhastighed: 1,875 ips; 15 ips; 3,75 ips; 30 ips; 7,5 ips; Andet
ro-RO: Viteză bandă suportată: 1,875 ips; 15 ips; 3,75 ips; 30 ips; 7,5 ips; Altele
es: Velocidad de cinta admitida: 1,875 ips; 15 ips; 3,75 ips; 30 ips; 7,5 ips; Otros
de: Unterstützte Bandgeschwindigkeit: 1,875 Zoll/s; 15 Zoll/s; 3,75 Zoll/s; 30 Zoll/s; 7,5 Zoll/s; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Podprte hitrosti traku: 1,875 ips; 15 ips; 3,75 ips; 30 ips; 7,5 ips; Drugo
fr: Vitesse de bande prise en charge: 1,875 ips; 15 ips; 3,75 ips; 30 ips; 7,5 ips; Autre
it: Velocità del nastro supportata: 1,875 ips; 15 ips; 3,75 ips; 30 ips; 7,5 ips; Altro
vi: Tốc độ băng được hỗ trợ: 1,875 ips; 15 ips; 3,75 ips; 30 ips; 7,5 ips; Khác
ru: Поддерживаемая скорость ленты: 1,875 дюйм/с; 15 дюйм/с; 3,75 дюйм/с; 30 дюйм/с; 7,5 дюйм/с; Другой
en: Tape speed supported: 1.875 ips; 15 ips; 3.75 ips; 30 ips; 7.5 ips; Other
hr-HR: Podržana brzina trake: 1,875 ips; 15 ips; 3,75 ips; 30 ips; 7,5 ips; Ostalo